test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-lingkwe_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle, plural object
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: [лыманум, лымананум]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: [лыман, лыма̄нын]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: [лыма̄нэ, лымана̄нэ]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [лыманаме̄н, лымананме̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [лыманн, лыманы̄н, лымананы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [лыманэ̄н, лымананэ̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [лыманув, лыманӯв, лымананув, лымананӯв]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [лыманы̄н, лымананы̄н]
    лыӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [лыма̄ныл, лымана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    лыӈкве+V+Ger: ла̄им
    лыӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg1: ла̄имам
    лыӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg2: ла̄иман
    лыӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg3: [ла̄има, ла̄иматэ]
    лыӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu1: ла̄имаме̄н
    лыӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu2: ла̄иман
    лыӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu3: ла̄имаг
    лыӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl1: ла̄имав
    лыӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl2: ла̄иман
    лыӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl3: ла̄имат

#Privative
    лыӈкве+V+VAbess: лыгтал
